North Dakota, session 69, SB2220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 12.1-41 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Law enforcement guidelines - Training - Prevention .
1. Each law enforcement agency shall develop and implement specific operational
guidelines for handling a crime involving human trafficking, prostitution, or commercial
exploitation of children.
a. The guidelines must include procedures for:
(1) Conducting a criminal investigation;
(2) Arresting a suspect;
(3) Assisting a victim;
(4) Connecting a victim with services; and
(5) Any additional procedures necessary to carry out this chapter.
b. The attorney general shall assist a law enforcement agency in the development
and implementation of procedures.
2. The peace officer standards and training board shall establish a training and education
program for law enforcement officers and state's attorneys on detecting, responding
to, and investigating a crime involving human trafficking, prostitution, or commercial
exploitation of children.
a. The training must include information on community resources for a victim.
Page No. 1 25.0955.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. The training must be:
(1) Trauma-informed and victim-centered in approach;
(2) Developed in conjunction with state's attorneys;
(3) Implemented as a ten - hour requirement for the law enforcement academy
initial officer training; and
(4) Included as a five - hour continuing education requirement during the life of a
peace officer license.
Page No. 2 25.0955.01000